Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.280

Delegation to assistive personnel—Supervisor duties.

Speech-language pathologists are responsible for patient care given by assistive personnel under their supervision. A speech-language pathologist may delegate to assistive personnel selected acts, tasks, or procedures that fall within the scope of speech-language pathology practice but do not exceed the education or training of the assistive personnel.

[ 2009 c 301 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.